Utah statutes.
53A-6-304.    Filling of vacancies.

(1)  A UPPAC vacancy occurs if a member resigns, fails to attend three or more meetings during a calendar year, or no longer meets the requirements for nomination and appointment.

(2)  If a vacancy occurs, the state superintendent shall appoint a successor to fill the unexpired term.

(3)  If the superintendent does not fill the vacancy within 60 days, the board shall make the appointment.

(4)  Nominations to fill vacancies are submitted to the superintendent in accordance with procedures established under rules of the board.

